test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VTA_AM_IMP_waabam_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  VTA+Imp - AM - waabmaa :
     
  #Template Key
  #NO TEMPLATE
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO: waabmishin  #2sg v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1PlO: waabmishnaang  #2sg v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1PlO: waabmishnaang  #2pl v 1pl !2v1pl ambig elsewhere...
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1SgO: waabmishik  #2pl v 1sg 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: waabam  #2sg v 3sg 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: waabmin  #2sg v 3sg 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO: waabam  #2sg v 3pl 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO: waabmin  #2sg v 3pl 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Imm+21Pl+3SgO: waabmaadaa  #21pl v 3sg 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Imm+21Pl+3PlO: waabmimiinaadaanik  #21pl v 3pl 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO: waabmik     #2pl v 3sg 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO: waabmik  #2pl v 3pl 

     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1SgO: waabmishkan  #2sg v 1sg
     #waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1PlO: UNKNOWN  #2sg v 1pl
     #waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1PlO: UNKNOWN  #2pl v 1pl !2v1pl ambig elsewhere...
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1SgO: waabmishiikek  #2pl v 1sg 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO: waabmaakan  #2sg v 3sg 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO: waabmaakan  #2sg v 3pl 
     #waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Del+21Pl+3SgO: UNKNOWN  #21pl v 3sg 
     #waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Del+21Pl+3PlO: UNKNOWN  #21pl v 3pl 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO: waabmaakek     #2pl v 3sg 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO: waabmimiinaakek  #2pl v 3pl 

     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Neg+2Sg+1SgO: waabmishke  #2sg v 1sg
     #waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Neg+2Sg+1PlO: UNKNOWN  #2sg v 1pl
     #waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Neg+2Pl+1PlO: UNKNOWN  #2pl v 1pl !2v1pl ambig elsewhere...
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Neg+2Pl+1SgO: waabmishkego  #2pl v 1sg 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Neg+2Sg+3SgO: waabmaake  #2sg v 3sg 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Neg+2Sg+3PlO: waabmaake  #2sg v 3pl 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Neg+21Pl+3SgO: waabmaasiidaa  #21pl v 3sg 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Neg+21Pl+3+PlO: waabmaasiidaanig  #21pl v 3pl 
     #waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Neg+2Pl+3SgO: UNKNOWN     #2pl v 3sg 
     #waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Neg+2Pl+3PlSgO: UNKNOWN  #2pl v 3pl 
